Florida, session 2026, HB361.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 106.1405, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
106.1405 Use of campaign funds.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Campaign-related child care expenses" means the costs
associated with the care of a candidate's dependent child due to
campaign activities, such as participating in campaign events,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb361-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 361 2026
canvassing, participating in debates, and meeting with
constituents or donors.
(b) "Eligible child care provider" means any individual or
licensed organization that provides child care services,
including center-based, family-based, and in-home care, for
compensation, is legally operating under state law, and complies
with all applicable state and local requirements for the
provision of child care services.
(2) A candidate or the spouse of a candidate may not use
funds on deposit in a campaign account of such candidate to
defray normal living expenses for the candidate or the
candidate's family, other than expenses actually incurred for
transportation, meals, and lodging by the candidate or a family
member during travel in the course of the campaign.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2), a candidate may use
funds on deposit in his or her campaign account to pay for
campaign-related child care expenses if the expense would not
exist were it not for the candidate's campaign and if the
following conditions are met:
(a) Campaign funds may not be used for child care expenses
unrelated to campaign activities, such as personal errands or
routine child care.
(b) The candidate maintains and provides to the division,
upon request, clear records of all campaign-related child care
expenses reimbursed by campaign funds, including dates, times,
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb361-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 361 2026
and descriptions of campaign events in which the candidate
engaged.
1. Receipts or invoices from the eligible child care
provider, along with proof of payment, must be maintained for
auditing purposes for at least 3 years after the campaign ends.
2. A candidate shall disclose the use of campaign funds
for campaign-related child care expenses in his or her regular
campaign finance reports, specifying the amounts and dates of
such expenses.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb361-00